PRIVACY POLICY
Last Updated: March 11, 2024
These Terms and Conditions (the “
Terms
”) govern your use of the mobile applications (the “
App
”), provided by APPCAPITAL AG, a company registered at Baarerstrasse 78, 6300, Zug, Switzerland, together with companies in the same corporate group (hereinafter “AppCapital Group”) (“
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”).
Our contact details:
Address: Baarerstrasse 78, 6300, Zug, Switzerland
E-mail: kb@appcapital.vc
Please read this Privacy Policy carefully as it contains important information about the following:
· How do we collect your Personal and Face Data?
· How do we process your Personal and Face Data?
· When can we share your Personal Data?
· How long do we retain your Personal and Face Data?
· Do we use automated decision-making or refer to the automated profiling?
· What rights do you have?
We may update this Privacy Policy from time-to-time to keep it in conformity with the relevant legislation, including the Regulation of the European Parliament and of the Council (EU) 2016/679 (the “
GDPR
”) and California Consumer Privacy Act 2018 (the “
CCPA
”). We will keep you informed about the changes to our Privacy Policy. If we make any major changes to our Privacy Policy and will need your explicit consent for further processing of your Personal Data, we will request your consent or your renewed consent (in case it was obtained previously).
HOW DO WE COLLECT YOUR FACE DATA?
Our Apps do not directly collect or store face data. It functions by requesting access to the user's camera, enabling the processing of facial photos to technically be able to use our Apps. With the user's explicit consent, Apps then transfer the processed data for storage in a designated section separate from the Apps, typically the user's photo gallery on its device. This approach ensures that the App’s role is strictly limited to processing face data and that we do not collect it to any of our storage or server.
HOW DO WE PROCESS AND USE YOUR FACE DATA?
We affirm that we do not utilize the collected face data for any purposes. Since the data remains securely stored on the user's device, we do not have access to it and, consequently, do not have any intentions to use this data in any form. We prioritize user privacy and, therefore, do not share any face data with third parties or external services. The data processed by our Apps is exclusively stored on the user's device. This ensures that the user retains full control and ownership of their personal information at all times.
HOW LONG DO WE RETAIN YOUR FACE DATA?
The duration for which face data is retained is entirely controlled by the user. Given that the data is stored locally on the user's device, they have the authority to manage and delete the data as per their preference. We do not impose any restrictions or guidelines on the retention period of the face data.
HOW DO WE COLLECT YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
We collect Personal Data if you provide it to us or automatically by electronic means.
HOW DO WE PROCESS YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
We respect your privacy and aim to limit the Personal Data that we collect from you to the amount which is strictly necessary to fulfil the purposes of processing.
Categories of Personal Data that we process are specified below:
Purpose of the processing
Personal Data
Legal basis for the processing
To register your account in the App
1) E-mail, 2) general location data (determined by the built-in tool in the App)
Terms and Conditions *Without providing this data you will not be able to use some of the App’s features
To ensure proper use of the App, including the ability to monitor and troubleshoot technical issued
1) Technical data such as IP address, device ID, general location data, device model, date and time of access (the “Technical Data”), 2) Usage experience, i.e. information about your use of the App (the “User Data”)
Terms and Conditions *Without providing this data you will not be able to use some of the App’s features
To communicate with you
1) E-mail or 2) phone number or 3) any other information that you have made public in the messengers or social networks you used to contact us at the time of contacting us (name, photo, etc.) 4) information that you provide us when you contact us
Our legitimate interest in receiving communication from you and reacting to it and your interest in getting our response
To manage and optimize users’ experience by improving our knowledge of our users
1) Technical Data, 2) User Data
Our legitimate interest in evaluating and creating statistics on the use of the App and your interest in the App updates which will be tailored to your needs
To provide you with advertising, including that is relevant to your interests
1) Technical Data, 2) User Data
Our legitimate interest based on the balance of interests while you have absolute right to object to direct marketing
Purpose of the processing;Personal Data;Legal basis for the processing
To register your account in the App;1) E-mail, 2) general location data (determined by the built-in tool in the App);Terms and Conditions *Without providing this data you will not be able to use some of the App’s features
To ensure proper use of the App, including the ability to monitor and troubleshoot technical issued; 1) Technical data such as IP address, device ID, general location data, device model, date and time of access (the “Technical Data”), 2) Usage experience, i.e. information about your use of the App (the “User Data”); Terms and Conditions *Without providing this data you will not be able to use some of the App’s features
To communicate with you;1) E-mail or 2) phone number or 3) any other information that you have made public in the messengers or social networks you used to contact us at the time of contacting us (name, photo, etc.) 4) information that you provide us when you contact us; Our legitimate interest in receiving communication from you and reacting to it and your interest in getting our response
To manage and optimize users’ experience by improving our knowledge of our users; 1) Technical Data, 2) User Data; Our legitimate interest in evaluating and creating statistics on the use of the App and your interest in the App updates which will be tailored to your needs
To provide you with advertising, including that is relevant to your interests; 1) Technical Data, 2) User Data; Our legitimate interest based on the balance of interests while you have absolute right to object to direct marketing
WHEN CAN WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
We can share your Personal Data with third parties only in the cases listed below:
When we are required by law
: We may disclose your Personal Data to the extent that we are required to do so by law (which may include to government bodies and law enforcement agencies), in connection with any legal proceedings or prospective legal proceedings and in order to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights (including providing information to others for the purposes of fraud prevention).
With our partners who help us support the App
: We may have partners that help us to make the App better, including analytics and advertising partners which may process your Technical Data and some User Data for analytical and advertising purposes respectively.
The list of our analytics and advertising partners:
·
Google Analytics
. Google Analytics is a web analytics service provided by Google, Inc. Address: Google, Google Data Protection Office, 1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA,
Privacy Help Center
.
Privacy Policy of Google Inc.
;
·
Facebook Ads
. Facebook Ads Manager is a Facebook tool that allows to create and manage ads provided by Meta Platforms, Inc. Address: 1601 Willow Road, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA.
Privacy Policy of Meta;
·
Google Ads
. Google Ads is a contextual advertising service from Google, Inc. Address: Google, Google Data Protection Office, 1600 Amphitheatre Pkwy, Mountain View, CA 94043, USA,
Privacy Help Center
.
Privacy Policy of Google Inc.
Please note that some of these companies may be located outside the EU (international data transfers) including in the countries which do not ensure an adequate level of protection of your Personal Data. Where this is the case, we meet the strict conditions of Personal Data transfers from the member states of European Union to other countries by using the Standard Contractual Clauses (SCC) adopted by the European Commission to ensure that Personal Data are properly protected or relying on other derogations compliant with GDPR. In case you want to check the relevant SCC, the links to them are provided below:
·
Google Analytics
. Transfer to the USA and Singapore is based on
Google Ads Controller-Controller Data Protection Terms
and
Google Ads Data Processing Terms
;
·
Facebook Ads
. Transfer to the countries specified
here
based on the
Data Processing Terms
and
Facebook European Data Transfer Addendum
;
·
Google Ads
. Transfer to the USA and Singapore based on
Google Ads Controller-Controller Data Protection Terms
and
Google Ads Data Processing Terms
.
HOW LONG DO WE RETAIN YOUR PERSONAL DATA?
We retain your Personal Data for no longer than it is necessary to fulfill the purposes specified in the section “How do we process your Personal Data”. Except for any legal obligation that sets a longer data retention period, at the end of these periods, the Personal Data processed will be deleted or anonymized.
DO WE USE AUTOMATED DECISION-MAKING OR REFER TO THE AUTOMATED PROFILING?
We neither use automated decision-making nor refer to the automated profiling.
WHAT RIGHTS DO YOU HAVE?
Rights of EU residents:
(1)
The right of access
to your Personal Data meaning that you can receive a copy of the Personal Data that we hold about you, as well as other supplementary information.
(2)
The right to rectification
of your Personal Data which is incomplete or inaccurate.
(3)
The right to erasure
of your Personal Data meaning that you can ask us to delete or remove your Personal Data in certain circumstances. Note, that we can retain your Personal Data as necessary to comply with our legal obligations or resolve disputes. If we have no grounds to continue processing your Personal Data, we will delete or remove it and notify you about such deletion or removal.
(4)
The right to restrict processing
of your Personal Data if (a) the accuracy of the Personal Data is contested by you, (b) the processing is unlawful and you oppose the erasure of the Personal Data, (c) we no longer need the Personal Data for the purposes of the processing, but they are required by you for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, and (d) you have objected to processing pending the verification whether the legitimate grounds override this.
(5)
The right to data portability
. The right to portability of your Personal Data, which applies only to information we have processed based on your consent or Terms and Conditions.
(6)
The right to object to the processing
of your Personal Data where we are relying on a legitimate interest and there is something about your particular situation that makes you want to object to the processing on this ground. We will no longer process the Personal Data unless we demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims.
(7)
Right to withdraw consent
at any time where we are relying on the consent to process your Personal Data. If we have no other grounds for processing your Personal Data, after you send us a request to withdraw consent, we will stop processing your Personal Data that we were processing under your consent.
We will address your request as early as possible and no longer that within 1 month. Please note that this period may be extended by 2 further months where necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the requests. In this case, we will inform you of the extension within 1 month of receipt of your request and will explain you the reasons for the delay.
Rights of California residents:
(1)
The right to opt out.
Under the CCPA each California resident can request business stops selling Personal Data to third parties.
Do we actually “sell” Personal Data?
We do not, and will not, provide your Personal Data in direct exchange for money. Therefore, in the literal sense, we do not sell your Personal Data.
(2)
Other rights.
You also have a right to be informed about what categories of Personal Data we are collecting: you can request us to disclose what Personal Data we have collected in the past 12 months and right to get a free copy of your Personal Data disclosed in a readily usable and readable format. You can also request us to delete the Personal Data we have collected in the past 12 months. We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of your rights granted under CCPA.
Mandatory Verification
: As required by CCPA we will need to verify your identity before processing your request. In order to verify your identity, you will be asked to log in to your account or (if you do not have an account) we will try to match the information you provided with the information we handle about you. In certain circumstances, we may decline the request, mainly where we are unable to verify your identity, for example, if you have requested us to delete your Personal Data.
As required by CCPA we endeavor to respond to a verifiable request within 45 days of its receipt. If we require more time (up to 90 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing. We will deliver our written response by e-mail.
How to exercise any of your rights?
You may
exercise your rights by sending a relevant request to the e-mail indicated in the contact details.
If you have any comments about how we process your Personal Data, please let us know and we will consider your claim. If you are not satisfied with our response to the complaint, you have the right to file a complaint with the competent authority.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://support.google.com/policies/answer/9581826?p=privpol_privts&hl=en&visit_id=638010219789684096-3703888282&rd=1:
Skip to main content
Privacy Help Center
You have a range of controls to manage your privacy across Google’s services. To find answers to many common questions about privacy and your data in Google’s products and services, select an option below or visit our
Privacy Policy
.
There are also specialized resources and tools to help you with:
Account recovery
Suspected hacked accounts
Removal of information from a Google product or service
Technical problems
Get help with a Google product
Visit our
help center and support forums
.
Google Account recovery & suspected compromised accounts
Recover or get back in to your Google Account
If you're having problems with a personal account:
Learn
how to recover your Google Account or Gmail
.
Follow these steps to
recover your account
.
If you still can't recover your account, find the
Product Forum
for the product you're using and create a post with your question.
If you're using a Google product with a work or school account,
find help for Google Workspace
.
Suspect that your account has been compromised
Suspicious activity in your account
If you find suspicious activity on your account, follow the steps to
secure your account
. Use
Security Checkup
to check your account security settings.
If you think a crime has been committed
If you think a crime has been committed, you may wish to contact law enforcement.
If you're getting someone else's email
Find out why you're
getting someone else's email
.
Report content or information you would like removed from a Google product or service
Report content or information
Learn how to remove potentially illegal or unauthorized content on Google.
Google provides specific streamlined processes to remove content that can contain users' personal information from Google services.
This page
will help you get to the right place to report content that you would like removed from Google's services under applicable laws.
If your request relates to Youtube, learn more about
YouTube’s Privacy Guidelines
.
Your account controls
Download your data from Google products & services
Learn about downloading your data
, or visit the
Takeout Tool
to download your data from Google products and services.
You can also use our tools to
access and review your data
or
delete your data
.
Submit a data access request
If the info you are looking for is not available via the tools mentioned above,
submit a data access request
and specify:
The categories of personal data you are seeking;
The products or services to which the data relates;
Any approximate dates when you think the data may have been collected by Google.
You’ll need to
sign in to your Google Account
to complete the form.
Review your basic account info & data
When you’re signed in to a Google Account
, you can always review and update info by visiting the Google services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control info saved in your
Google Account
. These tools include:
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play.
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage info associated with specific products.
Personal Info
allows you to manage your contact info, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Data & Personalization settings page
allows you to personalize your data, such as Activity & Timeline, things you create and to or select general preferences for the web.
You can also learn about
changing your Google Account picture, name & other info.
When you’re signed out
, you can manage info associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Delete your data
Delete your activity
You can
delete activity
, including your
Location History
. You can also
choose to have this info deleted automatically
after a set period of time.
Learn more about how to
see, control and delete the info in your Google Account
.
Delete a product or service
Delete your Gmail
.
Remove other products & services
.
Delete your Google Account
You can
delete your Google Account
at any time. If you change your mind or accidentally delete your account, you might be able to get it back. Learn
how to recover your account
.
Once your account is deleted, all your data and account content is removed from our systems after a certain amount of time. Our
policy
describes why we hold on to different types of data for different periods of time. Once you delete your Google Account, you’ll no longer be able to use the following:
Services that require you to sign in, like Gmail, Drive, and Calendar;
Data associated with your account, including emails, photos, and records of transactions;
Subscriptions on YouTube;
Content you purchased on Google Play, like movies, games, or music;
Info you've saved in Chrome;
Your Gmail username. Once it’s deleted, you can't use it again later, and you can't create a new Google Account with the same username.
In addition to these tools, we also offer specific deletion controls in our products, like Photos.
How to access and control your data
Certain laws can grant you the right to request access to your personal information. We believe this is best achieved by putting you in control of your data. That’s why we have created user-friendly
tools
to make it easier for people to access and review their data, download and move it to another service, or delete it entirely.
To protect our users, we have implemented advanced security infrastructure to ensure that we only allow authorized individuals to access personal information relating to them.
Our user-facing tools are designed to provide you with your personal information in a concise, transparent, intelligible, and easily accessible form. For example:
Activity Controls
allow you to review and manage what types of activity you would like saved to your Google Account. If you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your Google Account, so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations.
You can also allow Web & App Activity to save to your Google Account
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps that you install and use on Android. You can access and manage your Web & App Activity data in the intuitive Web & App activity user interface.
You can also download data through Google’s
download your data tool
. This tool will allow you to tailor what data you want to access, how frequently you want the data provided, and to where the data should be sent.
While these tools are the most effective way for you to control how Google’s core services process your data, you can also submit requests through the
data access form
that is available through the
Privacy Help Center
.
Below, you can find more information about how to use each of these options available to you.
How can I access my data?
The three main ways to access and manage your data are:
Directly access your data through Google's services themselves and your Google Account
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your
Google Account
.
By using Google’s intuitive user interfaces and controls you can easily access and manage data across many Google services. For example:
My Activity
. You can use this setting to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play.
For example, if you want to find out that website you found on Google Search last week, you can use the simple search functionality. You can:
Search by keywords by typing into the search box terms the terms you want to search;
Filter by date and product by simply clicking the “filter by date & product” button and inputting the dates and product you are interested in; or
Browse all your saved activity.
You can also use the specific Web & App Activity, Location History, or YouTube History interfaces if to search in those spaces or you want to access the granular controls available for those services.
Web & App Activity
. To review and manage your activity on Google sites and apps, including associated info like location, that is used to give you faster searches, better recommendations, and more personalized experiences in Maps, Search, and other Google services.
Location History
. To review and manage information about where you go with your devices, even when you aren't using a specific Google service, which information is used to give you personalized maps, recommendations based on places you've visited, and more.
YouTube History
. To review and manage the YouTube videos you watch and the things you search for on YouTube which is used to give you better recommendations, help remind you where you left off, and more.
My Ad Center
. You can see and manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Customise Ads
. Choose topics and brands you want to see more or fewer ads about.
Manage Privacy
. You can tailor and turn off info you don't want used to personalize your ads.
The
My Ad Center preferences
page in My Activity also allows you to see and manage My Ad Center preferences, such as ads you’ve liked or blocked.
Google Workspace search history
. When you use Google Workspace products like Gmail and Google Drive, you can choose for Google to store the searches you make so you can review and manage them.
Purchases and reservations. Manage your
purchases
and
r
eservations
made using Search, Maps, and the Assistant.
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Directly access your data through the download your data tool
As Google provides many varied services that can be used in many ways in multiple combinations, with a multitude of settings the actual information collected in relation to each individual is highly dependent on if and how an individual uses any of the services. This means that information processed about your use of Google services may differ from another user’s use of Google services.
Google Takeout gives you a flexible and powerful tool to access data in a tailored and intuitive way. By using
Google Takeout
you can download data from many Google services in a concise, transparent, and easily intelligible form.
See below for information on how to use Google Takeout and also some examples of the wide range of services and information available through Google Takeout.
Using Google Takeout
To use Google Takeout, follow these simple steps. For more information see this
Help Center
.
Access the Takeout tool from one of the many surfaces it is linked, such as the
Privacy Help Center
. You will need to be signed into the Google account you are trying to access to download data related to that Google account.
You can choose to tailor what services you want data from by navigating to a specific Google service you want to obtain your personal information from.
Select the Google service you are interested in by clicking the tickbox.
If you only want to download some of your data from a product, you may have the option to select a button like the circled All data included
. Then, you can uncheck the box next to data you don’t want to include.
You would then click Next Step.
In this final step you can, among other things, select how frequently you want this data exported and the destination for export. For example, you can automatically create an archive of your selected data every 2 months for one year. The first archive will be created immediately.
Once the export is ready you will receive an email with a link to where you can access the requested information. Depending on the amount of information in your account, this process could take different times. Most people get the link to their archive the same day that they request it.
Examples of available information
Google Account
- includes data about your account registration and account activity, such as:
Account registration information such as creation date, terms of service IP address, terms of service language, account recovery information such as recovery email, recovery sms and alternate email addresses.
IP activity such as IP address, timestamp, browser information, operating system details, and the device that is being used to access the website.
Google Play Store
-
data about your Google Play Store activity, such as:
Installs - List of your Google Play app installs and associated data such as timestamp, update time, device carrier details, model details, manufacturer details.
Redemption history - List of your Google Play promo redemptions and associated data.
Purchase history - List of your Google Play purchases and associated data such as user language, user code, timestamp.
Order history - Detailed purchase data regarding your Google Play orders and associated data such as location data including IP address.
Devices - data about your devices that have accessed the Google Play Store such as location data.
Play settings - Settings for your Google Play apps and associated data.
Access Log Activity
-
logs of your account activity, such as:
Activity IP logs: a list of Google services accessed by your devices (e.g. every time your phone synchronizes with your Gmail), including timestamps, IP addresses, and browser details;
Device logs: a list of devices (e.g. Nest, Pixel, iPhone), which have accessed your Google account in the past 30 days.
Submit a request to the specialist privacy operations team
Google has designed a specific
data access form
that is accessible through the
Privacy Help Center
. It is linked in the Google
Privacy Policy
. Submissions through this form go to Google’s specialist privacy operations team. All requests submitted through this form are individually assessed. As requests submitted through this form are manually reviewed, triaged and responded to, they will take longer to process than using the automated self-help tools.
When you fill in the
data access form
, you will be asked to provide certain information to help direct your request:
Your email address – this allows us to verify your identity (learn more in our
FAQ
);
Your country of residence – this is to  help us identify the legal rights that govern your request;
The product (or products) you are inquiring about – this helps us to find what data you are requesting, and to identify any tools available for you to access that data directly (see above); and
Information about what information you are seeking – this is important for us to be able to know the scope of your request, and our data access form allows you to be as broad or specific as you want. The specificity of your request will affect the response you receive. For example:
You can ask for all of the data Google processes relating to you (i.e., ‘Any data’ or ‘All data’). Because this is a very broad request, the initial response you get will identify online tools where you can access your data, and our specialist privacy team may ask you to provide more clarity to help them provide a more helpful response.
If you can specify particular data points that you want, or specific categories of data, such as call recordings, chat transcripts, details of logins etc. it may allow your request to be processed more efficiently.
You might find it helpful to refer to the information we publish about how we process data through the products you're interested in, typically the
Google Privacy Policy
, or the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
if you're using our enterprise Cloud products. If the data requested is not available through the online tools, our specialist privacy team will search for the data.
Upon receipt of your request submitted via the
data access form
your request will be processed as follows:
The specialist privacy operations team will confirm that the individual making the request is the same individual to whom the data relates. For example, if you submit a request from one Google account asking for information about another Google account, we would ask that you submit your request from the relevant Google account.
Once the specialist privacy team confirms that you are the individual to whom the requested data relates, they will assess the detail of your request and determine how to respond. For example:
if the complexity of the request requires further time to respond, they will inform you of that extended time period.
if your request is unclear or relates to a large quantity of information they will ask that you clarify your request by specifying the information or processing activities to which the request relates.
If you can clarify the scope of the request, such as by identifying specific categories of data or services to which your request relates, it will help our specialist privacy team provide a more tailored response. This may mean detailing specific user facing tools that provide you with access to the relevant data in the most concise and intelligible format with instructions on how to utilise those tools.
if the requested data is not available in the user -facing tools they will conduct searches to identify in scope data for production.
Once relevant, in scope data is identified by the specialist privacy operations team they will compile it, applying exemptions as appropriate (e.g. where disclosure of such data could adversely affect the rights and interests of third parties).
Once the in scope documents have been prepared the data will be provided to you through a relevant production avenue such as a specialist platform that you can use to access data that has been manually compiled by the relevant teams.
If, after a diligent search of our systems, no data is identified in response to your request, you will be informed that no responsive data was identified.
Please note that there is certain data that we will not be able to provide in response to a request.
For more information on submitting access requests see the
FAQ
.
FAQs
Verifying the identity of the individual making a request
If an individual is seeking access to data:
that is associated with a Google Account, that individual will need to submit their request from the authenticated email address associated with that Google Account to access that data. If they submit their request from another email address that is not associated with the Google Account and we cannot verify that the requested data relates to them they will not obtain access to information associated with that Google Account.
that is processed in a manner that does not identify the individual, such information cannot generally be verified as relating to the person making the request. This could apply to information that is processed without being associated to a particular individual. For example, data processed in the context of Google’s SafesSites is associated with a Chrome wide API key which could not be used to authenticate individual users. As such SafeSites data would not be provided in response to an access request.
Why does Google ask me to log into my Google account to access Google account data?
There are several good reasons why we ask a user to log into the Google account they are seeking information about. By doing so, we can help to protect user privacy, comply with regulations, and prevent fraud.
To protect user privacy. By confirming the identity of the user, we can be sure that we are only sharing data with the person who is authorized to receive it. This helps to protect user privacy and prevent unauthorized access to personal information.
To comply with regulations. Many laws and regulations require organizations to take steps to protect the privacy of their users. One of these steps is to confirm that an individual requesting access to information is the individual to whom the information relates. This helps organizations to comply with these laws and regulations and protect their users' privacy.
To prevent abuse. When we share data with someone, we are essentially trusting them with that data. By confirming the user is entitled to the information that they have requested we protect our users' interests.
Can I use other information related to or from a Google account to access data associated with that Google account?
A user’s knowledge or possession of information (e.g. forwarded emails, details of IP addresses from which an account was accessed or cookie IDs), taken alone, is generally insufficient to verify that the user making a request is the individual to whom such data relates.
For example, emails, IP addresses or device information could be obtained by third parties through various means, such as a spouse/partner that shares a device or gains access to an account of their partner forwarding emails to themselves which they subsequently submit in order to hijack an account. Similarly, third parties could alter the contents of automated emails so that they appear to relate to a different account. Similarly, IP addresses and cookie ID, taken alone, are generally inadequate for verification purposes for many reasons, including because they can be shared by a number of different people at the same time.
Why are call recordings with Google customer support not available in Takeout?
As call recordings will require an assessment of whether they contain third party data, manual intervention is required to identify if there is third party data and if there is, redact that information as appropriate.
Why do you point me to user facing tools when I request access to my data?
As Google provides varied services that can be used in many ways in multiple combinations, with a multitude of settings, the actual information collected in relation to each individual is highly dependent on if and how an individual uses any of the services. This means that information processed about your use of Google services may differ from another user’s use of Google services.
We provide you with flexible and powerful tools to access and control data processed about you which we detail here. Those tools will provide you with access to concise, transparent, intelligible and easily accessible information about your data.
So when we receive a request we will often point users to the appropriate user facing tools that can be used to access the requested information.
What sort of data is not available in response to a request for my data?
You can review this
Help Center
to see details of data that will not be returned in response to a request.
Your privacy & security controls
Review your privacy settings
You have controls to manage your privacy across our services. You can use
Privacy Checkup
to review and adjust important privacy settings like those below. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products.
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, you can turn on Location History if you want traffic predictions for your daily commute, or you can save your YouTube Watch History to get better video suggestions.
Ad Settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal info is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
About You
Control what others see about you across Google services.
Review how you share data with third-party apps and sites
To help you safely share your data, Google lets you give third-party sites and apps access to different parts of your account.
Review
how you share data with third-party apps and sites
.
Review your security settings
Use
Security Checkup
to help make sure your account is safe and to strengthen your online security.
Learn more about how to
make your account more secure
.
Data & info Google collects
What info we collect & how we use it
We're committed to being clear about what info we collect and how we use it. You can find details of our commitments in our
Privacy Policy
. You'll also get explanations of the types of info we collect, how it's collected, why we collect it, how it's used, and when it's shared. You can also visit our
Safety Center
to learn about Google’s privacy and security principles.
Where your data is stored
To make sure our services are reliable, we maintain
servers around the world
. This means your info may be processed on servers outside of the country where you live. Regardless of where your info is processed, Google applies the same level of protection to your data.
Get help with privacy-related questions
Google's adherence to the EU-U.S. & Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework certification
, Google complies with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the EEA, UK and Switzerland.  We currently do not rely on the Swiss-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF to transfer personal information to the US. If you have a privacy concern related to Google’s adherence to the DPF with respect to your personal information, fill out this
web-form
.
For other privacy related questions, please visit our
Privacy Policy
.
Contact Google's Data Protection Office
Google has a designated team to address user privacy inquiries for its consumer and enterprise products.
There are also specialized resources and tools to help you with:
Account recovery
Suspected hacked accounts
Removal of information from a Google product or service
Technical problems
For additional information on Google’s privacy practices, please see our
Privacy Policy
.
Further, you can contact Google’s Data Protection Office via our designated
web-form
.
Enterprise customer requests & resources
Data processing through Google Cloud
If you use a consumer version
of Gmail, Drive, or other Google product, the Google
Terms of Service
and
Privacy Policy
apply to you.
Google doesn’t offer a Data Processing Agreement for the consumer versions of Gmail or Drive. Google does not act as a data processor for the consumer version of these services. If you have specific privacy concerns, data protection obligations, or compliance needs, consult with your legal counsel.
If your organization uses Google Workspace, Google Workspace for Education, or Google Cloud Platform services
, the
Cloud Data Processing Addendum
(CDPA) may apply to you. If your agreement does not already incorporate the CDPA (or its predecessor, the Data Processing Amendment or Data Processing and Security Terms, as applicable), you can accept the CDPA in the Admin Console by following the instructions
here
for Google Workspace and Google Workspace for Education, and
here
for Google Cloud Platform. However, please note that if your organization purchases Google Cloud Platform from a reseller, the CDPA will not apply to you, because you will enter data processing terms with your reseller instead. Please contact your reseller if you have questions about those terms.
In addition, the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
describes how we collect and process personal information (excluding our customer’s data) in relation to those services.
Find data processing terms
Google makes appropriate data processing terms available for certain products where it acts as a data processor, including those listed below.
Analytics
Learn how to accept the data processing terms.
Google Ads
, for Customer Match and Store Sales Direct
Google Cloud Platform
Google Workspace
and Google Workspace for Education
Google Tag Manager
Firebase
You can also find info on how Google helps
Google Ads
advertisers comply with GDPR. For other features related to Ads, view the
Google controller terms
.
You can find more info about the products and data processing terms at
privacy.google.com/businesses/compliance
.
Customer notifications of data access requests
If you are an enterprise end user in the European Economic Area, UK or Switzerland submitting a privacy inquiry, the contracts we have in place to protect our customers’ data may require us to notify your account administrator or cloud project owner of your request.
For more information, refer to the
Google Cloud Trust and Security website
.
Avoid & report scams
People sometimes use the Google brand to scam and defraud people. Learn more
how to avoid scams and where to report them
.
If you find suspicious activity on your account, learn how to help
secure your account
. Use Google's
Security Checkup
to check your account security settings.
Give feedback about this article
Choose a section to give feedback on
false
9035847808310116048
true
Search Help Center
true
true
true
Google Help
Help Center
Policies
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Submit feedback
Main menu
Google apps
false
false
Inaccurate - doesn't match what I see in the product
Hard to understand - unclear or translation is wrong
Missing info - relevant but not comprehensive
Irrelevant - doesn’t match the title and / or my expectations
Minor errors - formatting issues, typos, and / or broken links
Other suggestions - ideas to improve the content
Share additional info or suggestions
​
​
Do not share any personal info
Cancel
Submit
By continuing, you agree Google uses your answers,
account & system info
to improve services, per our
Privacy
&
Terms
.
false
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/business/m/privacy-and-data:
Language
Afrikaans
አማርኛ
العربية
অসমীয়া
Azərbaycan dili
Беларуская
Български
বাংলা
Bosanski
کوردیی ناوەندی
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Ελληνικά
English (UK)
English (US)
Español (España)
Español
Eesti
فارسی
Suomi
Français (France)
ગુજરાતી
Hausa
עברית
हिन्दी
Hrvatski
Kreyòl Ayisyen
Magyar
Հայերեն
Bahasa Indonesia
Italiano
日本語
Basa Jawa
ქართული
Қазақша
ភាសាខ្មែរ
ಕನ್ನಡ
한국어
Kurdî (Kurmancî)
кыргызча
Lingála
ພາສາລາວ
Lietuvių
Latviešu
Malagasy
Македонски
മലയാളം
Монгол
मराठी
Bahasa Melayu
မြန်မာဘာသာ
Norsk (bokmål)
नेपाली
Nederlands
Afaan Oromoo
ଓଡ଼ିଆ
ਪੰਜਾਬੀ
Polski
پښتو
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Ikirundi
Română
Русский
Ikinyarwanda
සිංහල
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Shona
Af-Soomaali
Shqip
Српски
SiSwati
Sesotho
Svenska
Kiswahili
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
Тоҷикӣ
ภาษาไทย
ትግርኛ
Filipino
Setswana
Türkçe
Українська
اردو
O'zbek
Tiếng Việt
isiXhosa
中文(简体)
中文(香港)
中文(台灣)
isiZulu
Transparency Center
Policies
Community Standards
Policies that outline what is and isn't allowed on our apps.
Meta Advertising Standards
Policies for ad content and business assets.
Other policies
Other policies that apply to Meta technologies.
How Meta improves
How we update our policies, measure results, work with others, and more.
Age-Appropriate Content
Explore how we help teens have safe, positive experiences on Facebook and Instagram.
Enforcement
Detecting violations
How technology and review teams help us detect and review violating content and accounts.
Taking action
Our three-part approach to content enforcement: remove, reduce and inform.
Security
Threat disruptions
How we take down coordinated adversarial networks to protect people using our services
Security threats
Challenges we investigate and counter around the globe
Threat reporting
Security research into the adversarial networks we’ve taken down since 2017
Features
Our Approach To Dangerous Organizations and Individuals
How we approach dangerous organizations and individuals.
Our approach to the opioid epidemic
How we support communities in the face of the opioid epidemic.
Our approach to elections
How we help prevent interference, empower people to vote and more.
Our approach to misinformation
How we work with independent fact-checkers, and more, to identify and take action on misinformation.
Our approach to newsworthy content
How we assess content for newsworthiness.
Our approach to Facebook Feed ranking
How we reduce problematic content in News Feed.
Our approach to explaining ranking
How we build AI systems.
Governance
Governance innovation
Oversight Board overview
How to appeal to the Oversight Board
Oversight Board cases
Oversight Board recommendations
Creating the Oversight Board
Oversight Board: Further asked questions
Meta’s Bi-Annual Updates on the Oversight Board
Tracking the Oversight Board’s Impact
Research tools
Content Library and Content Library API
Comprehensive access to public data from Facebook and Instagram
Ad Library tools
Comprehensive and searchable database of all ads currently running across Meta technologies
Other research tools and datasets
Additional tools for in-depth research on Meta technologies and programs
Reports
Community Standards Enforcement Report
Quarterly report on how well we're doing at enforcing our policies on the Facebook app and Instagram.
Intellectual Property
Report on how well we're helping people protect their intellectual property.
Government Requests for User Data
Report on government request for people's data.
Content Restrictions Based on Local Law
Report on when we restrict content that's reported to us as violating local law.
Internet Disruptions
Report on intentional internet restrictions that limit people's ability to access the internet.
Widely Viewed Content Report
Quarterly report on what people see on Facebook, including the content that receives the widest distribution during the quarter.
Regulatory and Other Transparency Reports
Download current and past regulatory reports for Facebook and Instagram.
At Meta, we’re committed to giving people a voice and keeping them safe.
Since 2016, we've used a strategy called "
remove
,
reduce
,
inform
" to manage content across Meta technologies.
This means we remove harmful content that goes against our
policies
, reduce the distribution of problematic content that doesn’t violate our policies, and inform people with additional context so they can decide what to click, read or share.
To help with this strategy, we have policies that describe what is and isn’t allowed on our technologies. Our teams work together to
develop
our policies and
enforce
them. Here’s how it works.
1
We collaborate with global experts in technology, public safety and human rights to create and update our policies.
How Meta improves
2
We build features for safety, so people can report content and block, hide or unfollow accounts.
Taking action
3
We enforce our policies using technology and human review.
Detecting violations
We keep people safe and let people hold us accountable by sharing our policies, enforcement and transparency reports.
Our policies
Our policies define what is and isn’t allowed on Meta technologies. If content goes against our policies, we take action on it.
Policies
Our enforcement
We use technology and review teams to detect, review and take action on millions of pieces of content every day on Facebook and Instagram.
How Meta enforces its policies
Our transparency reports
We publish regular transparency reports to show people how we’re doing at enforcing our policies.
Transparency reports
Our approach to explaining ranking
Artificial intelligence (AI) systems inform the ranking of content for many experiences on Meta’s products, such as viewing Facebook Feed, watching reels on Instagram or browsing Facebook Marketplace.
Our approach to explaining ranking
Recent updates
Integrity Reports, Fourth Quarter 2024
We’re publishing our fourth quarter reports for 2024, including the Community Standards Enforcement Report, Adversarial Threat Report, Widely Viewed Content Report and our Oversight Board Report for H2 2024. All of the reports are available in our Transparency Center.
Community Notes: A New Way to Add Context to Posts
As we announced on January 7, 2025, Meta will soon roll out a Community Notes program — a new way for the community to decide when posts are potentially misleading and add more context.
Expanding our focus on better explaining our policies
We’ve expanded a new feature that allows people to correct their first mistake for most first-time policy violations across Facebook and Instagram.
Click here for previous updates
Transparency Center
POLICIES
Community Standards
Meta Advertising Standards
Other policies
How Meta improves
Age-Appropriate Content
ENFORCEMENT
Detecting violations
Taking action
SECURITY
Threat disruptions
Security threats
Threat reporting
FEATURES
Our Approach To Dangerous Organizations and Individuals
Our approach to elections
Our approach to misinformation
Our approach to newsworthy content
Our approach to Facebook Feed ranking
Our approach to explaining ranking
GOVERNANCE
Governance innovation
Oversight Board overview
How to appeal to the Oversight Board
Oversight Board cases
Oversight Board recommendations
Creating the Oversight Board
Oversight Board: Further asked questions
Meta’s Bi-Annual Updates on the Oversight Board
Tracking the Oversight Board’s Impact
REPORTS
Community Standards Enforcement Report
Intellectual Property
Government Requests for User Data
Content Restrictions Based on Local Law
Internet Disruptions
Widely Viewed Content Report
Regulatory and Other Transparency Reports
RESEARCH TOOLS
Content Library and Content Library API
Ad Library Tools
Other research tools and datasets
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Cookies
Transparency Center
Policies
Community Standards, other policies and how we’re improving.
Enforcement
AI detection, human review, the Oversight Board, and how we prioritize.
Security
Taking down coordinated adversarial networks to counter global threats and improve our defenses.
Features
Governance
Meta’s Oversight Board and other governance innovations.
Research tools
Research tools and datasets
Reports
Reports on enforcement effectiveness, how we use your data, and more.
Accept cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies on this site to help personalize and improve content and services, and provide a safer experience. You can review your cookie controls at any time. Learn more about cookies uses and controls in our
Cookie Policy
.
Learn More
Accept All